Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1124.
do enact as follows:AB1124,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table - See PDF for table - See PDF for table - See PDF for table AB1124,28Section 2. 20.370 (9) (pq) of the statutes is created to read:AB1124,2,12920.370 (9) (pq) Mississippi River erosion control revolving loan program. As a 10continuing appropriation, from the environmental fund, the amounts in the 11schedule for the Mississippi River erosion control revolving loan program under s. 1223.199.AB1124,313Section 3. 23.199 of the statutes is created to read:AB1124,2,181423.199 Mississippi River erosion control revolving loan program. (1) 15The department shall administer a revolving loan program to assist municipalities 16and owners of homes located on the shore of the Mississippi River where the 17structural integrity of municipal buildings or homes is threatened by erosion of the 18shoreline.AB1124,2,2019(2) The department shall make loans under this section from the 20appropriation account under s. 20.370 (9) (pq).AB1124,3,221(3) The department shall promulgate rules to administer this section, 1including rules establishing eligibility criteria and income limitations for loans 2under this section.AB1124,43Section 4. Nonstatutory provisions.AB1124,3,74(1) Position authorization. The authorized FTE positions for the 5department of natural resources, funded from the appropriation under s. 20.370 (9) 6(pq), are increased by 0.5 SEG position for the purpose of administering the 7Mississippi River erosion control revolving loan program.AB1124,3,198(2) Emergency rules. The department of natural resources may use the 9procedure under s. 227.24 to promulgate emergency rules under s. 23.199 for the 10period before the date on which permanent rules under s. 23.199 take effect. 11Notwithstanding s. 227.24 (1) (c) and (2), emergency rules promulgated under this 12subsection remain in effect until the first day of the 25th month beginning after the 13effective date of the emergency rules, the date on which the permanent rules take 14effect, or the effective date of the repeal of the emergency rules, whichever is earlier. 15Notwithstanding s. 227.24 (1) (a) and (3), the department of natural resources is not 16required to provide evidence that promulgating a rule under this subsection as an 17emergency rule is necessary for the preservation of public peace, health, safety, or 18welfare and is not required to provide a finding of emergency for a rule promulgated 19under this subsection.AB1124,520Section 5. Effective date.AB1124,3,2221(1) This act takes effect on the day after publication, or on the 2nd day after 22publication of the 2025 biennial budget act, whichever is later.AB1124,3,2323